Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB92.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 531.335 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of possession or viewing of matter portraying a sexual
performance by a minor when, having knowledge of its content, character, and that
the sexual performance is by a minor or computer-generated image of a minor, he
or she:
(a) Knowingly has in his or her possession or control any matter which visually
depicts a[an actual] sexual performance by a minor person or computer-
generated image of a minor person; or
(b) Intentionally views any matter which visually depicts a[an actual] sexual
performance by a minor person or computer-generated image of a minor
person.
(2) The provisions of subsection (1)(b) of this section:
(a) Shall only apply to the deliberate, purposeful, and voluntary viewing of matter
depicting sexual conduct by a minor person or computer-generated image of a
minor person and not to the accidental or inadvertent viewing of such matter;
(b) Shall not apply to persons viewing the matter in the course of a law
enforcement investigation or criminal or civil litigation involving the matter;
and
(c) Shall not apply to viewing the matter by a minor or the minor's parents or
guardians, or to school administrators investigating violations of subsection
(1)(b) of this section.
(3) Possession or viewing of matter portraying a sexual performance by a minor is:
(a) A Class D felony if the person knows that the minor or computer-generated
image of a minor portrayed is less than eighteen (18) years old at the time of
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/3/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 496
the sexual performance; and
(b) A Class C felony if the person knows that the minor or computer-generated
image of a minor person portrayed is less than twelve (12) years old at the
time of the sexual performance.
(4) Any person convicted under this section shall not be released on probation or
parole until he or she has served at least eighty-five percent (85%) of the sentence
imposed.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/3/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed